dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ_0</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="sent" c="sentense splitter"/>
<sdef n="art" c="article"/>
<sdef n="n" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="prn" c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="v" c="verb"/>
<sdef n="past" c="past"/>
<sdef n="pri" c="pri"/>
<sdef n="adj" c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="adv" c="Adverbs"/>
<sdef n="sh" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cnj" c="conjunction"/>
<sdef n="prawyaya" c="prawyaya"/>
<sdef n="num" c="number"/>
<sdef n="sp" c="specifier" />
<sdef n="m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="f" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="pres" c="present tense"/>
<sdef n="preadv" c="pre adverb"/>
<sdef n="d" c="direct"/>
<sdef n="o" c="oblique"/>
<sdef n="pr" c="preposition"/>
<!-- <sdef n="Shashthi" c="shashthi"/> instead added parsarg:kA -->

<sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke_liye" c="ke_liye"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke_xvArA" c="ke_xvArA"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kA" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>

<sdef n="sg" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="pl" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="fsg" c="following noun singular"/>
<sdef n="fpl" c="following noun plural"/>

<sdef n="p1" c="first"/>
<sdef n="p2" c="second"/>
<sdef n="p2_h0" c="second_honorific wu jA"/>
<sdef n="p2_h1" c="second_honorific wuma jAo"/>
<sdef n="p2_h2" c="second_honorific Apa jAyiye"/>
<sdef n="p2_h" c="second_honorific"/>
<sdef n="p3" c="third"/>

<sdef n="tam:imper" c="imperative(AFjAvAcaka)"/>
<sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
<sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
<sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
<sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
<sdef n="tam:gA" c="gA"/>
<sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
<pardef n="nIce__adv">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--
<pardef n="k/__pr">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->
<pardef n="prawyaya">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prawyaya"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="parsarg">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="conjunct">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cnj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="art">
<e><p><l></l><r>vaha<s n="art"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>vaha<s n="art"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>vaha<s n="art"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>vaha<s n="art"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r>vaha<s n="art"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/prperso">
        <e><p><l>use</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>use</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>use</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>use</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>unhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>muJe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hameM</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>muJe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hameM</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>muJe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hameM</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>muJe</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hameM</l><r>prperso<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--
<pardef n="/be">
        <e><p><l>WeM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WeM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WeM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WA</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>We</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WA</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 		
        <e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hUM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hEM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>huM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WeM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>WeM</l><r>hE<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>

       </pardef>
-->
<pardef n="/sakawA_hE__tam">
        <e><p><l>sakawIM hEM</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawIM ho</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawIM hEM</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawI hE</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawI hE</l><r>sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawI hUz</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawe hEM</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawe ho</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawe hEM</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawA hE</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawA hE</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sakawA hUz</l><r>0_sakawA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="hE"><i></i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="ke liye"><i>ke<b/>liye</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="prperso"><i></i><par n="/prperso"/></e>
<e lm="hE"><i></i><par n="/be"/></e>
<e lm="vaha"><i></i><par n="art"/></e>
<e lm="0_sakawA_hE"><i></i><par n="/sakawA_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="0_sakawA_hE"><i></i><par n="/sakawA_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="ko"><i>ko</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="ke_liye"><i>ke_liye</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="ke_xvArA"><i>ke_xvArA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="meM"><i>meM</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="para"><i>para</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="vAlA"><i>vAlA</i><par n="prawyaya"/></e>
<e lm="Oura"><i>Oura</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="Oura"><i>Oura</i><par n="cnj"/></e>
<e lm="aWavA"><i>aWavA</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="AkASIya"><i>AkASIya</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lagaBaga"><i>lagaBaga</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pqWaka"><i>pqWaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="teDA"><i>teDA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm=""><i></i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="niraMwara"><i>niraMwara</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="wruti"><i>wruti</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nisanxeha"><i>nisanxeha</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="paryApwa"><i>paryApwa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="xUra"><i>xUra</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="xqDawApUrvaka"><i>xqDawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bahuXA"><i>bahuXA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="niRTurawAse"><i>niRTurawAse</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="xiKAvatI"><i>xiKAvatI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="anxara"><i>anxara</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aviXvaMsiwA"><i>aviXvaMsiwA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="TIka"><i>TIka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="uxArawApUrvaka"><i>uxArawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="uxAsI"><i>uxAsI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="niSciMwawApUrvaka"><i>niSciMwawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kaBIkaBI"><i>kaBIkaBI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bAhara"><i>bAhara</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="saMBavawaH"><i>saMBavawaH</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="saMBavawaH"><i>saMBavawaH</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="TIka"><i>TIka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kaxAciwa"><i>kaxAciwa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="katuwApUrvaka"><i>katuwApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kramaSaH"><i>kramaSaH</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kuCa"><i>kuCa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="saPalawApUrvaka"><i>saPalawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pUrNawa"><i>pUrNawa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sacamuca"><i>sacamuca</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vyAkaraNa-viruxXa"><i>vyAkaraNa-viruxXa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="asamAnyawaH"><i>asamAnyawaH</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="jisameM"><i>jisameM</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="AdZA"><i>AdZA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kadZA"><i>kadZA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sAPZa-sAPZa"><i>sAPZa-sAPZa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="azXerA"><i>azXerA</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sarvowwama"><i>sarvowwama</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="AwmatuRtipUrvaka"><i>AwmatuRtipUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="avajFApUrvaka"><i>avajFApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="Aroha"><i>Aroha</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mAraka"><i>mAraka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aXogAmI"><i>aXogAmI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="uwsAhapUrvaka"><i>uwsAhapUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="suxUra"><i>suxUra</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="KuSI-KuSI"><i>KuSI-KuSI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="anaBijFawApUrvaka"><i>anaBijFawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aMwaHsWalIya"><i>aMwaHsWalIya</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="anuvAwa"><i>anuvAwa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="paraspara"><i>paraspara</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bAharI"><i>bAharI</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ekaxama"><i>ekaxama</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="lABAMSa"><i>lABAMSa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nirxayawApUrvaka"><i>nirxayawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sacamuca"><i>sacamuca</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="katuwApUrvaka"><i>katuwApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="uparyukwa"><i>uparyukwa</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="behawarIna"><i>behawarIna</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aSiRta"><i>aSiRta</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sawarkawApUrvaka"><i>sawarkawApUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="uwsAhapUrvaka"><i>uwsAhapUrvaka</i><par n="nIce__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kA"><i>k</i><par n="k/__pr"/></e>
